Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.505.150

Budgeted expenditures as appropriations—Interim expenditures—Transfer between budget classes—Liability for nonbudgeted expenditures.

Total budgeted expenditures for each fund as adopted in the budget of a school district shall constitute the appropriations of the district for the ensuing fiscal year and the board of directors shall be limited in the incurring of expenditures to the grand total of such appropriations. The board of directors shall incur no expenditures for any purpose in excess of the appropriation for each fund: PROVIDED, That no board of directors shall be prohibited from incurring expenditures for the payment of regular employees, for the necessary repairs and upkeep of the school plant, for the purchase of books and supplies, and for their participation in joint purchasing agencies authorized in RCW 28A.320.080 during the interim while the budget is being settled under RCW 28A.505.140: PROVIDED FURTHER, That transfers between budget classes may be made by the school district's chief administrative officer or finance officer, subject to such restrictions as may be imposed by the school district board of directors.

Directors, officers or employees who knowingly or negligently violate or participate in a violation of this section by the incurring of expenditures in excess of any appropriation(s) shall be held civilly liable, jointly and severally, for such expenditures in excess of such appropriation(s), including consequential damages following therefrom, for each such violation. If as a result of any civil or criminal action the violation is found to have been done knowingly, such director, officer, or employee who is found to have participated in such breach shall immediately forfeit his or her office or employment, and the judgment in any such action shall so provide.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the duty of the attorney general to carry out the provisions of RCW 43.09.260, as now or hereafter amended.

[ 1990 c 33 s 423; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 15. Formerly RCW 28A.65.470.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118: See note following RCW 28A.505.010.